Washington statutes.
RCW 12.12.090

Discharge of jury.

Whenever a justice shall be satisfied that a jury, sworn in any civil cause before him or her, having been out a reasonable time, cannot agree on their verdict, he or she may discharge them, and issue a new venire, unless the parties consent that the justice may render judgment on the evidence before him or her, or upon such other evidence as they may produce.

[ 2010 c 8 s 3026; Code 1881 s 1778; 1873 p 348 s 77; 1854 p 236 s 78; RRS s 1855.]